hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX R7 Y 54 # существительные русские с твердым ь
SFX R7 0 0/G2 .
SFX R7 ь а/G2 .
SFX R7 ь аӧсь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ад/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ам/G2 .
SFX R7 ь анӧй/G2 .
SFX R7 ь аныд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь аным/G2 .
SFX R7 ь аныс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ас/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧ/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдз/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдзныд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдзным/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдзныс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдзыд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдзым/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдзыс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдныд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдным/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдныс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдыд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдым/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧдыс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧй/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйкӧд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйла/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйлань/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйланьсянь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйлӧн/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйлы/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйлысь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйся/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйсянь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧйтӧг/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧн/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ӧс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыдкӧд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыдла/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыдлӧн/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыдлы/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыдлысь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ын/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ынӧсь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыс/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыскӧд/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ысла/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыслӧн/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыслы/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ыслысь/G2 .
SFX R7 ь ысь/G2 .

SFX R0 Y 1 # русские выражения и их части
SFX R0 0 0 .

SFX S2 Y 61 # l/v
SFX S2 0 0/G2 .
SFX S2 в ладӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лад/G2 .
SFX S2 в ламӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лам/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланӧй/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланыдӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланыд/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланымӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланым/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланысӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в ланыс/G2 .
SFX S2 в ласӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лас/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧ/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдз/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдзныд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдзным/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдзныс/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдзыд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдзым/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдзыс/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдныд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдным/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдныс/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдыд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдым/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧдыс/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧй/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйкӧд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйла/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйлань/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйланьсянь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйлӧн/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйлы/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйлысь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйся/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйсянь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧйтӧг/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧн/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧнӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лӧс/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыдкӧд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыдла/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыдлань/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыдлӧн/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыдлы/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыдлысь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лын/G2 .
SFX S2 в лынӧсь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыс/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыскӧд/G2 .
SFX S2 в лысла/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыслань/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыслӧн/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыслы/G2 .
SFX S2 в лыслысь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лысь/G2 .
SFX S2 в лысьӧсь/G2 .

SFX S3 Y 54 # -лль
SFX S3 0 0/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ля/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ляӧсь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ляд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь лям/G2 .
SFX S3 ь лянӧй/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ляныд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ляным/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ляныс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь ляс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧ/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдз/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдзныд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдзным/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдзныс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдзыд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдзым/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдзыс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдныд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдным/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдныс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдыд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдым/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧдыс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧй/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйкӧд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйла/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйлань/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйланьсянь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйлӧн/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйлы/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйлысь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйся/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйсянь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧйтӧг/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧн/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льӧс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыдкӧд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыдла/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыдлӧн/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыдлы/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыдлысь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льын/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льынӧсь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыс/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыскӧд/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льысла/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыслӧн/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыслы/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льыслысь/G2 .
SFX S3 ь льысь/G2 .

SFX S4 Y 54 # -ддя
SFX S4 0 0/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дя/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дяӧсь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дяд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дям/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дянӧй/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дяныд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дяным/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дяныс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дяс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧ/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдз/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдзныд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдзным/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдзныс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдзыд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдзым/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдзыс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдныд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдным/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдныс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдыд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдым/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧдыс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧй/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйкӧд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйла/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйлань/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйланьсянь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйлӧн/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйлы/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйлысь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйся/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйсянь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧйтӧг/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧн/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьӧс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыдкӧд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыдла/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыдлӧн/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыдлы/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыдлысь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьын/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьынӧсь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыс/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыскӧд/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьысла/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыслӧн/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыслы/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьыслысь/G2 .
SFX S4 ь дьысь/G2 .
